Missouri, session 2026, SB1598.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 516.105, 538.205, and 538.210, RSMo,
are repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
be known as sections 516.105, 538.205, and 538.210, to read as
follows:
516.105. 1. All actions against physicians,
hospitals, dentists, registered or licensed practical
nurses, optometrists, podiatrists, pharmacists,
chiropractors, professional physical therapists, mental
health professionals licensed under chapter 337, and any
other entity providing health care services and all
employees of any of the foregoing acting in the course and
scope of their employment, for damages for malpractice,
negligence, error or mistake related to health care shall be
brought within two years from the date of occurrence of the
act of neglect complained of, except that:
(1) In cases in which the act of neglect complained of
is introducing and negligently permitting any foreign object
to remain within the body of a living person, the action
shall be brought within two years from the date of the
discovery of such alleged negligence, or from the date on
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1598 2
which the patient in the exercise of ordinary care should
have discovered such alleged negligence, whichever date
first occurs; and
(2) In cases in which the act of neglect complained of
is the negligent failure to inform the patient of the
results of medical tests, the action for failure to inform
shall be brought within two years from the date of the
discovery of such alleged negligent failure to inform, or
from the date on which the patient in the exercise of
ordinary care should have discovered such alleged negligent
failure to inform, whichever date first occurs; except that,
no such action shall be brought for any negligent failure to
inform about the results of medical tests performed more
than two years before August 28, 1999. For purposes of this
subdivision, the act of neglect based on the negligent
failure to inform the patient of the results of medical
tests shall not include the act of informing the patient of
the results of negligently performed medical tests or the
act of informing the patient of erroneous test results; and
(3) In cases in which the act of neglect complained of
is the negligent use, selection, or implementation or
unduly, detrimentally, or erroneously relying on artificial
intelligence, as such term is defined in section 538.205, in
the diagnosis, treatment, and care of a patient, the action
shall be brought within two years from the date of the
discovery of such alleged negligence or reliance, or from
the date on which the patient in the exercise of ordinary
care should have discovered such alleged negligence or
reliance, whichever date first occurs; and
(4) In cases in which the person bringing the action
is a minor less than eighteen years of age, such minor shall

SB 1598 3
have until his or her twentieth birthday to bring such
action.
In no event shall any action for damages for malpractice,
error, or mistake be commenced after the expiration of ten
years from the date of the act of neglect complained of or
for two years from a minor's eighteenth birthday, whichever
is later.
2. Any service on a defendant by a plaintiff after the
statute of limitations set forth in subsection 1 of this
section has expired or after the expiration of any extension
of the time provided to commence an action pursuant to law
shall be made within one hundred eighty days of the filing
of the petition. If such service is not made on a defendant
within one hundred eighty days of the filing of the
petition, the court shall dismiss the action against the
defendant. The dismissal shall be without prejudice unless
the plaintiff has previously taken or suffered a nonsuit, in
which case the dismissal shall be with prejudice.
538.205. As used in sections 538.205 to [538.230]
538.235, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Artificial intelligence", a computer system,
computer software or algorithms, or physical hardware that
provide or generate human-like perception, cognition,
planning, learning, decision-making, communication, or
physical action in the rendering or assisting of rendering
of health care services;
(2) "Catastrophic personal injury", a physical injury
resulting in:
(a) Quadriplegia defined as the permanent loss of
functional use of all four limbs;

SB 1598 4
(b) Paraplegia defined as the permanent loss of
functional use of two limbs;
(c) Loss of two or more limbs;
(d) An injury to the brain that results in permanent
cognitive impairment resulting in the permanent inability to
make independent decisions or engage in one or more of the
following activities of daily living: eating, dressing,
bathing, toileting, transferring, and walking;
(e) An injury that causes irreversible failure of one
or more major organ systems; or
(f) Vision loss such that the patient's central visual
acuity is no more than twenty/two-hundred in the better eye
with the best correction or whose field of vision in the
better eye is restricted to a degree that its widest
diameter subtends an angle no greater than twenty degrees;
[(2)] (3) "Economic damages", damages arising from
pecuniary harm including, without limitation, medical
damages, and those damages arising from lost wages and lost
earning capacity;
[(3)] (4) "Employee", any individual who is directly
compensated by a health care provider for health care
services rendered by such individual and other nonphysician
individuals who are supplied to a health care provider by an
entity that provides staffing;
[(4)] (5) "Equitable share", the share of a person or
entity in an obligation that is the same percentage of the
total obligation as the person's or entity's allocated share
of the total fault, as found by the trier of fact;
[(5)] (6) "Future damages", damages that the trier of
fact finds will accrue after the damages findings are made;
[(6)] (7) "Health care provider", any physician,
hospital, health maintenance organization, ambulatory

SB 1598 5
surgical center, long-term care facility including those
licensed under chapter 198, dentist, registered or licensed
practical nurse, optometrist, podiatrist, pharmacist,
chiropractor, professional physical therapist, psychologist,
physician-in-training, and any other person or entity that
provides health care services under the authority of a
license or certificate;
[(7)] (8) "Health care services", any services that a
health care provider renders to a patient in the ordinary
course of the health care provider's profession or, if the
health care provider is an institution, in the ordinary
course of furthering the purposes for which the institution
is organized. Professional services shall include, but are
not limited to, transfer to a patient of goods or services
incidental or pursuant to the practice of the health care
provider's profession or in furtherance of the purposes for
which an institutional health care provider is organized;
[(8)] (9) "Medical damages", damages arising from
reasonable expenses for necessary drugs, therapy, and
medical, surgical, nursing, x-ray, dental, custodial and
other health and rehabilitative services;
[(9)] (10) "Noneconomic damages", damages arising from
nonpecuniary harm including, without limitation, pain,
suffering, mental anguish, inconvenience, physical
impairment, disfigurement, loss of capacity to enjoy life,
and loss of consortium but shall not include punitive
damages;
[(10)] (11) "Past damages", damages that have accrued
when the damages findings are made;
[(11)] (12) "Punitive damages", damages intended to
punish or deter malicious misconduct or conduct that

SB 1598 6
intentionally caused damage to the plaintiff, including
exemplary damages and damages for aggravating circumstances;
[(12)] (13) "Self-insurance", a formal or informal
plan of self-insurance or no insurance of any kind.
538.210. 1. A statutory cause of action for damages
against a health care provider for personal injury or death
arising out of the rendering of or failure to render health
care services is hereby created, replacing any such common
law cause of action. The elements of such cause of action
are that the health care provider failed to use that degree
of skill and learning ordinarily used under the same or
similar circumstances by members of the defendant's
profession and that such failure directly caused or
contributed to cause the plaintiff's injury or death. A
health care provider failing to use that degree of skill and
learning ordinarily used under the same or similar
circumstances by members of the defendant's profession and
where the failure directly causes or contributed to cause
the plaintiff's injury or death includes, but is not limited
to, a health care provider negligently using, selecting, or
implementing or unduly, detrimentally, or erroneously
relying on artificial intelligence in the diagnosis,
treatment, and care of a patient and such negligence or
reliance directly causes or contributes to the plaintiff's
injury.
2. (1) In any action against a health care provider
for damages for personal injury arising out of the rendering
of or the failure to render health care services, no
plaintiff shall recover more than four hundred thousand
dollars for noneconomic damages irrespective of the number
of defendants.

SB 1598 7
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1)
of this subsection, in any action against a health care
provider for damages for a catastrophic personal injury
arising out of the rendering or failure to render heath care
services, no plaintiff shall recover more than seven hundred
thousand dollars for noneconomic damages irrespective of the
number of defendants.
(3) In any action against a health care provider for
damages for death arising out of the rendering of or the
failure to render health care services, no plaintiff shall
recover more than seven hundred thousand dollars for
noneconomic damages irrespective of the number of defendants.
3. This section shall also apply to any individual or
entity, or their employees or agents:
(1) That provide, refer, coordinate, consult upon, or
arrange for the delivery of health care services to the
plaintiff; and
(2) Who is a defendant in a lawsuit brought against a
health care provider under this chapter, or who is a
defendant in any lawsuit that arises out of the rendering of
or the failure to render health care services.
4. No health care provider whose liability is limited
by the provisions of this chapter shall be liable to any
plaintiff based on the actions or omissions of any other
entity or individual who is not an employee of such health
care provider, unless the individual is an employee of a
subsidiary in which the health care provider has a
controlling interest and the subsidiary does not carry a
professional liability insurance policy or self-insurance
covering said individual of at least one million dollars per
occurrence and a professional liability insurance policy or

SB 1598 8
self-insurance covering said subsidiary of at least one
million dollars per occurrence.
5. The limitations on liability as provided for in
this section shall apply to all claims for contribution.
6. In any action against a health care provider for
damages for personal injury or death arising out of the
rendering of or the failure to render health care services,
where the trier of fact is a jury, such jury shall not be
instructed by the court with respect to the limitation on an
award of noneconomic damages, nor shall counsel for any
party or any person providing testimony during such
proceeding in any way inform the jury or potential jurors of
such limitation.
7. For purposes of sections 538.205 to 538.230, any
spouse claiming damages for loss of consortium of their
spouse shall be considered to be the same plaintiff as their
spouse.
8. Any provision of law or court rule to the contrary
notwithstanding, an award of punitive damages against a
health care provider governed by the provisions of sections
538.205 to [538.230] 538.235 shall be made only upon a
finding by the jury that the evidence clearly and
convincingly demonstrated that the health care provider
intentionally caused damage to the plaintiff or demonstrated
malicious misconduct that caused damage to the plaintiff.
Evidence of negligence including, but not limited to,
indifference to or conscious disregard for the safety of
others shall not constitute intentional conduct or malicious
misconduct.
9. For purposes of sections 538.205 to [538.230]
538.235, all individuals and entities asserting a claim for

SB 1598 9
a wrongful death under section 537.080 shall be considered
to be one plaintiff.
10. The limitations on awards for noneconomic damages
provided for in this section shall be increased by one and
seven-tenths percent on an annual basis effective January
first of each year. The current value of the limitation
shall be calculated by the director of the department of
commerce and insurance, who shall furnish that value to the
secretary of state, who shall publish such value in the
Missouri Register on the first business day following
100 January first, but the value shall otherwise be exempt from
101 the provisions of section 536.021.
102 11. In any claim for damages under this chapter, and
103 upon post-trial motion following a jury verdict with
104 noneconomic damages exceeding four hundred thousand dollars,
105 the trial court shall determine whether the limitation in
106 subsection 2 of this section shall apply based on the
107 severity of the most severe injuries.
108 12. If a court of competent jurisdiction enters a
109 final judgment on the merits that is not subject to appeal
110 and that declares any provision or part of either section
111 1.010 or this section to be unconstitutional or
112 unenforceable, then section 1.010 and this section, as
113 amended by this act and in their entirety, are invalid and
114 shall have no legal effect as of the date of such judgment,
115 and this act, including its repealing clause, shall likewise
116 be invalid and of no legal effect. In such event, the
117 versions of sections 1.010 and this section that were in
118 effect prior to the enactment of this act shall remain in
119 force.
✓